Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 439 Probation and Parole
439.3401.
Parole for violent offenders — Applicability of section to victim of domestic violence or abuse — Time of offense — Prohibition against award of credit.

As used in this section, “violent offender” means any person who has been convicted of or pled guilty to the commission of:

A capital offense;

A Class A felony;

A Class B felony involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to a victim;

An offense described in KRS

507.040

or

507.050

where the offense involves the killing of a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel while the peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel was acting in the line of duty;

A Class B felony involving criminal attempt to commit murder under KRS

506.010

if the victim of the offense is a clearly identifiable peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel acting in the line of duty, regardless of whether an injury results;

The commission or attempted commission of a felony sexual offense described in KRS Chapter 510;

Use of a minor in a sexual performance as described in KRS

531.310

;

Promoting a sexual performance by a minor as described in KRS

531.320

;

Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree as described in KRS 530.064(1)(a);

Human trafficking under KRS

529.100

involving commercial sexual activity where the victim is a minor;

Criminal abuse in the first degree as described in KRS

508.100

;

Burglary in the first degree accompanied by the commission or attempted commission of an assault described in KRS

508.010

,

508.020

,

508.032

, or

508.060

;

Burglary in the first degree accompanied by commission or attempted commission of kidnapping as prohibited by KRS

509.040

;

Robbery in the first degree; or

Incest as described in KRS 530.020(2)(b) or (c).

The court shall designate in its judgment if the victim suffered death or serious physical injury.

A violent offender who has been convicted of a capital offense and who has received a life sentence (and has not been sentenced to twenty-five (25) years without parole or imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole), or a Class A felony and receives a life sentence, or to death and his or her sentence is commuted to a life sentence shall not be released on probation or parole until he or she has served at least twenty (20) years in the penitentiary. Violent offenders may have a greater minimum parole eligibility date than other offenders who receive longer sentences, including a sentence of life imprisonment.

A violent offender who has been convicted of a capital offense or Class A felony with a sentence of a term of years or Class B felony shall not be released on probation or parole until he has served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence imposed.

A violent offender who has been convicted of a violation of KRS

507.040

where the victim of the offense was clearly identifiable as a peace officer, a firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel, and the victim was acting in the line of duty shall not be released on probation or parole until he or she has served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence imposed.

A violent offender who has been convicted of a violation of KRS

507.040

or

507.050

where the victim of the offense was a peace officer, a firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel, and the victim was acting in the line of duty shall not be released on probation or parole until he or she has served at least fifty percent (50%) of the sentence imposed.

Any offender who has been convicted of a homicide or fetal homicide offense under KRS Chapter 507 or 507A in which the victim of the offense died as the result of an overdose of a Schedule I controlled substance and who is not otherwise subject to paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection shall not be released on probation, shock probation, parole, conditional discharge, or other form of early release until he or she has served at least fifty percent (50%) of the sentence imposed.

A violent offender shall not be awarded any credit on his sentence authorized by KRS 197.045(1)(b)1. In no event shall a violent offender be given credit on his or her sentence if the credit reduces the term of imprisonment to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence.

This section shall not apply to a person who has been determined by a court to have been a victim of domestic violence or abuse pursuant to KRS

533.060

with regard to the offenses involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to the victim. The provisions of this subsection shall not extend to rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first degree by the defendant.

This section shall apply only to those persons who commit offenses after July 15, 1998.

For offenses committed prior to July 15, 1998, the version of this statute in effect immediately prior to that date shall continue to apply.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section extending the definition of “violent offender” to persons convicted of or pleading guilty to robbery in the first degree shall apply only to persons whose crime was committed after July 15, 2002.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1, effective February 15, 1991; 1992, ch. 173, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 77, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 401, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 182, § 27, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 19, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2011, ch. 2, § 99, effective June 8, 2011; 2013, ch. 101, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 66, § 19, effective March 25, 2015; 2018 ch. 89, § 15, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 115, § 10, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 136, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Compiler's Notes.

Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2 read: “The amendment of subsection (3) of Section 1 of this Act shall apply only to those persons who commit offenses after the effective date of this Act [February 15, 1991].”

The section is set out to reflect the proper set out of the last sentence of (1).

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women’s Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was amended in Section 10 of that Act.

(6/25/2013).
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 101, sec. 2, provides that Section 1 of the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known as the “Bryan Durman Act.”

439.3402.
Exemption from KRS 439.3401 for victims of domestic violence and abuse — Procedures — Effect.

Any violent offender as defined in KRS

439.3401

who was convicted prior to July 14, 1992, who claims to come within the definitions of KRS

503.050

and

533.060

and the purview of this section as the victim of domestic violence and abuse may be exempt from KRS

439.3401

under the conditions set forth in this section.

The offender shall file a motion in the Circuit Court in which the offender was convicted stating the facts which qualify the offender for exemption under this section.

The motion shall state whether the offender requests an evidentiary hearing, or whether the offender relies on the record of evidence already on file with the Circuit Court.

If the offender requests an evidentiary hearing the motion shall state what witnesses the offender wishes to testify and a brief summary of each witness’ expected testimony.

The motion shall state whether the offender wishes the court to appoint counsel to represent the offender or what attorney, if any, will represent the offender at the hearing. The appointment of counsel by the court shall be made in conformity with the provisions of KRS Chapter 31.

The Commonwealth shall respond to the motion within twenty (20) days after the motion was filed.

If the Commonwealth requests an evidentiary hearing and the offender did not, the Commonwealth’s response shall state what witnesses and evidence the Commonwealth intends to introduce.

The Commonwealth may stipulate to the offender’s evidence stated in the motion in lieu of the evidentiary hearing.

The Circuit Court shall hold any evidentiary hearing within thirty (30) days after the Commonwealth’s response was filed, or if the Commonwealth did not respond, within sixty (60) days.

The Circuit Court shall issue findings of fact and an order ruling upon the motion within thirty (30) days after the evidentiary hearing, or if no hearing was held, within sixty (60) days after the Commonwealth’s response was filed or due to be filed.

The order of the Circuit Court may be appealed in the manner as authorized for judgments in criminal cases.

Only one (1) motion under this section may be filed by the same offender regarding the same conviction.

The effect of granting a motion under this section is to remove the status as a violent offender for the offense for which the motion was filed and permit the offender to be eligible for parole in the manner specified in KRS

439.340

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 173, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

439.3403.
Reconsideration of parole of inmate given deferment or serve-out longer than sixty months — Exceptions — Hearings.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall reconsider the parole of any prisoner as of June 8, 2011, was given a deferment or serve-out of longer than sixty (60) months at the prisoner’s most recent parole hearing.

No reconsideration shall be required under this section for any prisoner who has received a deferment or serve-out of longer than sixty (60) months if:

The deferment or serve-out was approved by a majority vote of the full board; or

The prisoner stands convicted of a criminal offense currently defined as a violent offense in KRS

439.3401

or as a sex crime in KRS

17.500

, regardless of the date the crime was committed or the date of conviction.

The board shall schedule parole hearings for prisoners eligible for reconsideration of parole under this section according to the following schedule:

For a prisoner who has served less than sixty (60) months of his or her sentence as of June 8, 2011, the board shall schedule and conduct a parole hearing during the month the prisoner has served sixty (60) months of his or her sentence; and

For a prisoner who has served more than sixty (60) months of his or her sentence as of June 8, 2011, the board shall schedule and conduct a parole hearing within twelve (12) months of June 8, 2011.

The department shall provide all necessary assistance and information to the board in accordance with KRS

439.340

in order for the board to conduct timely hearings under subsection (1) of this section.

Parole hearings required under subsection (1) of this section shall be conducted in accordance with and subject to the provisions of KRS

439.250

to

439.560

, including but not limited to the requirements relating to notification of victims, the authority of the board to conduct hearings by panels of the board, and the requirement to keep records relating to the hearings.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 33, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3405.
Parole of prisoners with documented terminal medical conditions — Hearing.

Notwithstanding any statute eliminating parole or establishing minimum time for parole eligibility for a certain class or status of offender, including KRS 439.340(11),

439.3401

, 532.080(7), and

533.060

, the board, with the written consent of a majority of the full board, may review the case of any prisoner and release that prisoner on parole despite any elimination of or minimum time for parole eligibility, when the prisoner has a documented terminal medical condition likely to result in death within one (1) year or severe chronic lung disease, end-stage heart disease, severe neuro-muscular disease such as multiple sclerosis; or has severely limited mobility as a result of stroke, disease, or trauma; or is dependent on external life support systems and would not pose a threat to society if paroled.

Medical information considered under this section shall be limited to the medical findings supplied by Department of Corrections medical staff. The medical staff shall provide in writing the prisoner’s diagnosis and prognosis in support of the conclusion that the prisoner suffers from a terminal medical condition likely to result in death within one (1) year or because of the conditions set forth in subsection (1) of this section he or she is substantially dependent on others for the activities of daily living.

The medical information prepared by the Department of Corrections medical staff under this section shall be forwarded to the medical director of the Department of Corrections who shall submit that information and a recommendation for or against parole review under this section to the commissioner of the Department of Corrections or his or her designee. With the approval of the commissioner of the Department of Corrections, a request for parole review under this section, along with the medical information and medical director’s recommendation, shall be submitted to the board.

Medical information presented under this section shall be considered along with other information relevant to a decision regarding the granting of parole and shall not constitute the only reason for granting parole.

Notwithstanding KRS 439.340(5), in addition to or in conjunction with each review conducted under subsection (1) of this section for any prisoner convicted of a Class A or B felony, or of a Class C felony involving violence or a sexual offense and prior to the granting of parole to any such prisoner, the Parole Board shall conduct a hearing of which the following persons shall receive not less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30) days’ notice:

The Commonwealth’s attorney, who shall notify the sheriff of every county and the chief of police of every city and county in which the prisoner committed any Class A, B, or C felony for which he or she is imprisoned; and

All identified victims of the crimes or the next of kin of any victim who is deceased.

Notice to the Commonwealth’s attorney shall be by mail, fax, or electronic means, at the discretion of the board, and shall be in a manner that ensures receipt at the Commonwealth attorney’s business office. Notices received by chiefs of police and sheriffs shall be posted in a conspicuous location where police employed by the department may see it. Notices shall be posted in a manner and at a time that will allow officers to make comment thereon to the Parole Board. Notice to victims or their next of kin shall be made by mail, fax, or electronic means, at the discretion of the board, to their last known address or telephone number as provided by the Commonwealth’s attorney to the Parole Board at the time of incarceration of the prisoner. Notice to the victim or the next of kin of subsequent considerations for parole after the initial consideration shall not be sent if the victim or the next of kin gives notice to the board that he or she no longer wants to receive such notices. The notice shall include the time, date, and place of the hearing provided for in this subsection, and the name and address of a person to write if the recipient of the notice desires to attend the hearing or to submit written comments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 179, § 5, effective April 4, 1994; 1998, ch. 606, § 78, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 128, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2011, ch. 2, § 28, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Coy, A Brief Look at the Kentucky Parole System., Vol. 70, No. 5, September 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

439.3406.
Mandatory reentry supervision six months prior to projected completion date of inmate’s sentence for inmate not granted discretionary parole — Exceptions — Terms of supervision — No credit for time absconding — Report.

The board shall order mandatory reentry supervision six (6) months prior to the projected completion date of an inmate’s sentence for an inmate who has not been granted discretionary parole.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to an inmate who:

Is not eligible for parole by statute;

Has been convicted of a capital offense or a Class A felony;

Has a maximum or close security classification as defined by administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

Has been sentenced to two (2) years or less of incarceration;

Is subject to the provisions of KRS

532.043

;

Has six (6) months or less to be served after his or her sentencing by a court or recommitment to prison for a violation of probation, shock probation, parole, or conditional discharge;

If recommitted to prison for a violation of probation, shock probation, parole, or conditional discharge, has not served at least six (6) months since being recommitted; or

Has twice been released on mandatory reentry supervision.

An inmate granted mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to this section may be returned by the board to prison for violation of the conditions of supervision and shall not again be eligible for mandatory reentry supervision during the same period of incarceration.

An inmate released to mandatory reentry supervision shall be considered to be released on parole.

Mandatory reentry supervision is not a commutation of sentence or any other form of clemency.

No hearing shall be required for the board to order an inmate to mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Terms of supervision for inmates released on mandatory reentry supervision shall be established as follows:

The board shall adopt administrative regulations establishing general conditions applicable to each inmate ordered to mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If an inmate is ordered to mandatory reentry supervision, the board’s order shall set forth the general conditions and shall require the inmate to comply with the general conditions and any requirements imposed by the department in accordance with this section;

Upon intake of an inmate ordered to mandatory reentry supervision by the board, the department shall use the results of the risk and needs assessment administered pursuant to KRS 439.3104(1) to establish appropriate terms and conditions of supervision, taking into consideration the level of risk to public safety, criminal risk factors, and the need for treatment and other interventions. The terms and conditions imposed by the department under this paragraph shall not conflict with the general conditions adopted by the board pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; and

The powers and duties assigned to the commissioner in relation to probation or parole under KRS

439.470

shall be assigned to the commissioner in relation to mandatory reentry supervision.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the period of mandatory reentry supervision shall conclude upon completion of the individual’s minimum expiration of sentence.

If the board issues a warrant for the arrest of an inmate for absconding from supervision during the mandatory reentry supervision period, and the inmate is subsequently returned to prison as a violator of conditions of supervision for absconding, the inmate shall not receive credit toward the remainder of his or her sentence for the time spent absconding.

The department shall report the results of the mandatory reentry supervision program to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary by February 1, 2015.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 34, effective January 1, 2012; 2012, ch. 156, § 14, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 10, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 158, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

439.3407.
Conditional parole of state inmates to be served in local correctional facility, jail, or reentry center — Administrative regulations — Work release.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations to implement conditional parole of state inmates incarcerated in state corrections institutions or local correctional facilities or county jails to place those individuals closer to their communities prior to release. A parolee placed on conditional parole shall serve that term in a local correctional facility or county jail or reentry center in a county in which the fiscal court has agreed to house parolees if beds are available in the local correctional facility or county jail or reentry center.

The department may authorize parolees on conditional parole to be placed on work release. If a person placed in a county jail on conditional parole under subsection (1) of this section is granted work release, he or she shall pay the work release fees required by law to the jailer. The amount of work release fees paid by a parolee shall be deducted from the amount which the Department of Corrections shall pay for the placement of that parolee.

Local correctional facilities or county jails housing parolees under subsection (1) of this section shall have the same rights and obligations as jails housing felons pursuant to KRS

532.100

.

Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section relating to eligibility of an individual for conditional parole shall take into consideration, at a minimum, the following information about the individual:

The offense for which the individual was convicted and his or her rehabilitation efforts while incarcerated;

The security classification while incarcerated in the state correctional institution;

Conduct while incarcerated in the state correctional institution;

Ability to find employment in the community; and

The availability of additional applicable education, treatment or intervention, and training for employment in the local correctional facility or county jail, if needed by the individual.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 39, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 92, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 24, 2020.

439.3408.
Department to approve any acceptable housing for parolees.

When considering appropriate housing options for a person considered for parole or a person who is being paroled, the department shall approve any form of acceptable housing, including but not limited to apartments, shelters for homeless or other persons, county jails or restricted custody facilities that a county approves for parolees, educational institutions with dormitories if the parolee is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an educational institution, halfway houses, reentry centers, residential treatment or other programs in which the parolee is enrolled or accepted for enrollment, and other forms of transitional housing meeting the requirements of applicable statutes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 41, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 93, effective June 29, 2017.

439.341.
Probable cause revocation hearings of probation, parole, and postincarceration supervision violators.

Probable cause revocation hearings of probation, parole, and postincarceration supervision violators shall be conducted by hearing officers. These hearing officers shall be attorneys, appointed by the board and admitted to practice in Kentucky, who shall perform the aforementioned duties and any others assigned by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 259, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 2011, ch. 2, § 88, effective March 3, 2011; 2020 ch. 44, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.

439.342.
Retention of prisoner on parole.

The board may retain any prisoner on parole for a period of at least one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

439.344.
Effect of parole time on sentence — Exceptions.

The period of time spent on parole shall count as a part of the prisoner’s sentence, except when a parolee is:

Returned to prison as a parole violator for a new felony conviction;

Returned to prison as a parole violator after charges have been filed or an indictment has been returned for a felony offense committed while on parole and the prisoner is subsequently convicted of that offense;

Returned to prison as a parole violator and is subsequently convicted of a felony offense committed while on parole;

Returned to prison as a parole violator for absconding from parole supervision, except that the time spent on parole prior to absconding shall count as part of the prisoner’s sentence;

Returned to prison as a parole violator and it is subsequently determined that he or she owes restitution pursuant to KRS

439.563

and has an arrearage on that restitution. Any credit withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be reinstated when the arrearage is paid in full;

Classified as a violent offender pursuant to KRS

439.3401

; or

A registered sex offender pursuant to KRS

17.500

to

17.580

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 2; 2009, ch. 57, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 107, § 6, effective April 12, 2010.

439.345.
Compliance credits for eligible parolees — Definitions — Administrative regulations.

An individual on parole shall receive parole compliance credits to be applied toward the individual’s sentence, if the paroled individual does all of the following:

Fulfills the terms of his or her case plan;

Has no new arrests; and

Makes scheduled monthly payments for restitution, if any.

After one (1) full calendar month of being supervised, a supervised individual eligible under this subsection on parole shall receive thirty (30) days of supervised compliance credit for every full calendar month he or she is substantially compliant with supervision. After a supervised individual has served at least one (1) year on supervision, the accrued supervised compliance credits shall be applied towards the individual’s sentence.

As used in this subsection:

“Eligible” means an offender being supervised for a Class D felony that:

Does not qualify the offender as a violent offender as defined in KRS

439.3401

or a sexual offender as defined in KRS

17.550

; and

Did not result from a conviction of KRS

508.025

where the victim was a peace officer; and

“Substantially compliant” means:

Compliance with the terms of his or her case plan;

Has no new arrests; and

Makes scheduled monthly payments for restitution, if any.

After one (1) full calendar month of being supervised, a supervised individual eligible under this subsection on parole shall receive thirty (30) days of supervised compliance credit for every full calendar month he or she is substantially compliant with supervision. After a supervised individual has served at least two (2) years on supervision, the accrued supervised compliance credits shall be applied towards the individual’s sentence.

As used in this subsection:

“Eligible” means an offender who:

Is not a persistent felony offender; and

Is being supervised for a Class C felony that:

Does not qualify the offender as a violent offender as defined in KRS 439. 3401 or a sexual offender as defined in KRS 17. 550; and

Did not result from a conviction of KRS

218A.1401

,

218A.1410

,

218A.1411

,

218A.1412

,

218A.1413

,

218A.1414

,

218A.1421

,

218A.1423

,

218A.1430

,

218A.1438

, 218A.439, or

218A.286

; and

“Substantially compliant” means:

Compliance with the terms of his or her case plan;

Has no new arrests; and

Makes scheduled monthly payments for restitution, if any.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations for the awarding of parole compliance credits and supervised compliance credits pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 55, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

439.346.
Prisoner paroled or under postincarceration supervision subject to orders of board.

During the period of his or her parole or postincarceration supervision, the prisoner shall be amenable to the orders of the board and the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 3; 1982, ch. 344, § 45, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 108, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 89, effective March 3, 2011.

439.348.
Paroled prisoner under supervision of department — Cessation.

Paroled prisoners shall be under the supervision of the department and subject to its direction for the duration of parole. Supervision of the parolee by the department shall cease at the time:

Of recommitment of the prisoner to prison as a parole violator, including recommitment under a supervision continuation sanction, at which time the prisoner shall be considered an inmate; or

A final discharge from parole is granted to the parolee by the board.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1982, ch. 344, § 46, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 109, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 137, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

439.350.
Time served in prison and on parole not to exceed the period of the maximum sentence; exceptions; paroled prisoners to be amenable to orders of the board and division; supervision and direction of paroled prisoners; final discharge. [Repealed.]

439.352.
Recommitment of supervised individual on parole or post-release supervision — Effect.

Recommitment of a supervised individual on parole or post-release supervision to prison or jail on a new sentence received for commission of a crime while on parole or other post-release supervision shall automatically terminate his or her parole or other post-release supervision status on any sentence on which he or she has not received a final discharge, or a restoration of civil rights, prior to the date of recommitment. The prisoner shall, at the time of the recommitment on the new sentence, begin to accrue additional time credit toward conditional release or expiration of sentence on the sentence on which he or she had previously been on community supervision unless he or she has been finally discharged from community supervision on the sentence or has been restored to civil rights prior to the date of the recommitment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 5; 2020 ch. 44, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

439.354.
Final discharge of paroled prisoner — Conditions.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when any paroled prisoner has performed the obligations of his or her parole during his or her period of active parole supervision the board may, at the termination of such period to be determined by the board, issue a final discharge from parole to the prisoner. Unless ordered earlier by the board, a final discharge shall be issued when the prisoner has been out of prison on parole a sufficient period of time to have been eligible for discharge from prison by minimum expiration of sentence had he or she not been paroled, provided before this date he or she had not absconded from parole supervision or that a warrant for parole violation had not been issued by the board.

When any paroled prisoner classified as a violent offender pursuant to KRS

439.3401

, or registered as a sex offender pursuant to KRS

17.500

to

17.580

, has performed the obligations of his or her parole, the board shall issue a final discharge from parole to the prisoner when the prisoner has been out of prison on parole a sufficient period of time to have been eligible for discharge from prison by maximum expiration of sentence had he or she not been paroled, provided before this date he or she had not absconded from parole supervision or that a warrant for parole violation had not been issued by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 6; 2009, ch. 57, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

439.356.
Final discharge — Effect.

After final discharge has been ordered and a certificate issued by the board, or after the parolee’s civil rights have been restored by an act of the Governor, the parolee may not be held again for a violation of that parole.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 7.

439.358.
Final discharge provisions — Application.

The provisions of granting final discharges from parole, and the release from being again confined on the same sentence in the penitentiary following the granting of such discharge or following the restoration of the parolee’s civil rights, as set out in KRS

439.342

to

439.358

, shall be followed in all cases of those persons confined or paroled before, on, or committed after June 14, 1962.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 82, § 8.

439.360.
Conditionally released prisoners. [Repealed.]

439.370.
Commonwealth’s attorney to cause to be transmitted to the institution a concise statement of facts adduced at trial or hearing.

It shall be the duty of the Commonwealth’s attorney after the imposition of prison sentence, unless the defendant is granted probation, to cause to be forthwith transmitted to the institution with the commitment papers, a concise statement of the facts adduced at the trial or at the hearing of a plea of guilty, together with such notes of testimony as the board may request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 13, effective May 18, 1956.

439.380.
Prison officials to furnish members of board with access to prisoner, facilities for communicating with prisoner, reports and other facts.

It shall be the duty of all prison officials to furnish members of the board, or its properly accredited representatives:

Access at all reasonable times, to any prisoner over whom the board has jurisdiction under KRS

439.250

to

439.560

;

Facilities for communicating with and observing such prisoner;

Such reports as the board shall require concerning the conduct and character of any prisoner in their custody; and

Any other facts deemed pertinent by the board in determining whether such prisoner shall be paroled.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 14, effective May 18, 1956.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Coy, A Brief Look at the Kentucky Parole System., Vol. 70, No. 5, September 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

439.390.
Board may issue subpoenas — Penalty for false testimony or failure to comply with subpoena — Circuit Court may compel the attendance of witnesses, production of documents and giving of testimony before board.

The board shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such records, books, papers, and documents as it may deem necessary for investigation of the case of any person before it. Subpoenas may be signed and oaths administered by any member of the board. Subpoenas so issued shall be served by any sheriff, constable, police, parole or probation officer, or other peace officer and a return made to the board in the same manner as similar process in the Circuit Court. Any person who testifies falsely or fails to appear when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to produce documents, records, or other such material when subpoenaed, upon citation by the Circuit Courts where the board meets and after hearing by that court, shall be subject to the same order and penalties to which persons before that court are subject. Any Circuit Court, upon application of the board, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of documents, records or other such material, and the giving of testimony before the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 15, effective May 18, 1956.

439.400.
Things to be supplied to prisoner placed on probation or conditional release — Advancement for temporary maintenance. [Repealed.]

439.410.
Board’s order to be sufficient authority to officer in charge of state penal institution to release from custody paroled or conditionally released prisoner.

An order of the board shall be sufficient warrant and authority to the officer in charge of any state penal institution to release from custody any paroled prisoner or conditionally released prisoner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 17, effective May 18, 1956.

439.420.
Person out on parole not to be required to wear regulation dress of penitentiary.

No person shall be required to wear the regulation dress of the penitentiary or other thing indicating he is under conviction for a crime while out on parole.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 18, effective May 18, 1956; 1994, ch. 418, § 12, effective July 15, 1994.